dictionaries/ta_IN/ta_IN.dic
அம்மு/ACfHNQRrSTG
அரசாங்க/ABCcDfHJNnQR
அரசியலமைப்பு/H
அருகு/RiNPQTUuD
அல்ஜீரியா/D
அவ/TNABCDEfGHIJjmnQR
அவங்களுக்கு/RTNiQ
அவதானிப்பு/DNA
அவர்/CTEM
அவர்க/ABCDEfHIJjmNQRTM
இட/ADKMNC
உலக/DKNAvj
ஊர்/DKT
அவற்ற/j
அழுக்கு/GRSNA
அறிந்தது/DTNQA
அறிய/TNQ
அறைந்து/BN
அறையில்/uEU
அனுப்பி/EuBVN
அனுப்புவது/CRBDTNA
அனுபவம்/cT
ஆசு/GABCDHJjNnQRrT
ஆடம்/GQ
ஆடைக்கு/rNm
ஆண்/JI
ஆதரவ/Av
ஆபாச/AGNRrS
ஆயிரவாண்டு/H
ஆலயத்தில்/EU
ஆளுக்கு/Ni
ஆற்று/nQUDHCJNA
ஆன்மா/DN
இங்கிலாந்து/DHCJNA
இசைஞானி/N
இணைப்பு/RSDHCJNQ
இணைப்பில்/EU
இதழ/j
இருக்கை/CS
இருந்தவரு/HCNA
இருந்தவன்/T
இருந்துக்கிட்டு/Q
இருப்பாரு/RQn
இருப்பிட/fN
இலக்கணம்/c
இலக்கு/GRNtSDHCJQA
இல்லாத்/ABCHNQTEu
இல்லி/GNo
இனத்திற்கு/RSNm
ஈடுபட்டு/BNiQ
உட்கார்ந்து/BN
உடனடி/GS
உண்மைய/TAv
உணர்த்துவது/CRrA
உயிர்ப்பு/SHCJNi
உரிமை/CTGSINj
உருவாக்கப்பட்டது/NtTQ
உருவாக்கி/Eu
உறவு/RNtrBSHCJITAn
உன்னுள்/BDJIA
ஊதியம்/c
எச்சரிக்கைகளை/N
எஞ்சி/Eu
எடுத்தாள்/T
எடுத்துக்கு/n
எண்ணம்/MQ
எண்ணு/GRrBDHCJNEiAn
எதிர்காலத்துக்கு/R
எதிர்கொண்டு/Bi
எதிர்பார்த்து/BQ
எதிராளி/C
எம்/JE
எழுதி/TEuBVN
எழுதியதில்/EU
என்பது/CGRNtrBSDHJTQAn
என்பு/rHN
என்னிடம்/uEU
ஏழு/DNOQA
ஏற்பு/IA
ஏனு/GNAn
ஐ/NGo
ஒண்ணா/NE
ஒல்லி/GS
ஒன்ற/Avj
ஒன்று/GRNtrBSDHCJTQAn
ஒன்ன/j
ஓடு/GrNEAn
க/ACDMNnHRrQJITGvcmij
கங்கு/GADHMQN
கட்டிடம்/ACcDGHMTRSQf
கடு/GrACDHjMNRSQ
கணினிக்கு/Nm
கதைக்கு/RSNmi
க‌தை/T
கரு/CJNDcQAn
கருணை/CBVNj
கருத்துரை/C
கருதுவது/CRBDNQ
கலப்பு/RBDA
கலர/Av
கல்லு/GRrBDHCNQ
கலாச்சாரம்/cT
களத்து/DHCA
களை/GSNE
கனவு/RrSHCJTAn
காட்டுவதற்கு/R
காத்/u
காப்பாற்றுவதற்கு/RS
காலத்துக்கு/rTNm
காவ்/G
காவடி/No
காற்று/RrBDHCJTNiQA
கிளிநொச்சியில்/EU
குட்டு/JNEA
குடாநாட்டு/DHCA
குடி/CTuEUN
குடும்பத்த/j
குரு/GJcNQAn
குழந்தை/CTGSNj
குறிப்பு/GRrBSDHJTNQAn
குறிப்பிட்டு/RBTiQ
குறை/CTGBVNjEQ
குறைந்து/GBNiQn
குறைபாடு/RITNiQ
குறைவானது/RNtQ
கூடம்/c
கூடு/GRrDNEQA
கேரளத்து/DH
க்ைகக/Mm
கொட்டுவது/NA
கொடுத்தாள்/GE
கொடுப்பதற்கு/RSN
கொடுப்பதாக/N
கொம்பு/RrDJA
கோட்டைக்கு/m
ச/JNo
சகோதரர்களுக்கு/RN
சகோதரனுக்கு/r
சண்டைய/Av
சந்து/GBSDHCQAn
சந்திப்பது/CRBDNQn
சரியானது/RNtTQA
சரியில்லை/GNo
சனியன்று/T
சாதகமா/BV
சாதியில்/EU
சாந்து/B
சார்பு/RrSDIi
சிங்கம்/Mm
சிங்கப்பூரில்/EU
சித்ரா/TcN
சிரிப்ப/j
சிறியதாக/NQ
சீட்டு/GRDHCNA
சுற்றி/TEuN
சூடி/Eu
செய்யறத/Av
செலவழிப்பது/C
செவிக்கு/Nm
சென்னா/D
சேர்வது/CBDNA
சொ/Av
சொல்கிறது/GQn
சொல்லப்பட்டு/Bi
சொல்லு/GRNtrBSDHCJTEQn
சொன்னால்/T
சோதனைக்கு/RSNm
சோதிட/fN
டாண்/J
டெல்லி/CGN
தயக்கம்/c
தயாரிப்பதற்கு/RS
தருணம்/ME
தருமு/GQ
தல/CNo
தலையா/E
தலைவரு/GRrBSHCJINQn
தவற/Av
தளபதி/CSN
து/CGRNtrBSDHJmiQAn
தாக்கத்தில்/EU
தாவரங்களுக்கு/N
திட/fN
திரைக்கதை/CNj
திவாலாகி/BV
தின்றது/GNA
துண்டு/GRrBSDNAn
துணிவு/rJIA
தூரம்/cT
தெருவில்/TuEU
தென்கிழக்கு/DQAn
தேதிக்கு/m
தேர்/GDN
தேரடி/T
தேவுடு/G
தொழிற்சாலையில்/EU
தோல்விய/IT
நகர்வு/RrHCA
நடந்து/GRrBTNiQn
நடிப்பு/GBDHCJTNA
நமக்க/Av
நம்பியாரு/HCA
நவீனிடம்/EU
நாக்கு/rBDHCJNA
நாவலுக்கு/SN
நாளுக்கு/RrSNmi
நாஸ்கா/N
நிமிட/fN
நிரம்பி/EuBV
நின்றது/BNA
நிஜம்மா/T
நீதிமன்றம்/c
நுரையீரலுக்கு/m
நெஞ்ச/Nj
நொறுங்கி/E
நோ/CNGSBV
பக்கத்தில்/TuEU
பகார்டி/No
படிப்பது/CRBDTNQAn
படைப்பு/RNtrSDHT
பண்டிகைக்கு/R
பதிகம்/Mm
பதிப்பு/RrSDHNA
பதிப்பில்/EU
பதிவு/RNtrBSHCJTAn
பந்து/GDHCJNQA
பயனு/GRNtrDHCIiQA
பரபரப்பு/GRrSDCJNA
பரவா/Av
பரிமாணத்தை/N
பஸ்களுக்கு/Sm
பாசு/DAn
பாடுவது/CRDNA
பாதிப்பு/RBDHCTNAn
பாதுகாப்பதற்காக/Q
பாராட்டி/TEuBVN
பாருக்கு/Nm
பானை/CGN
பிடிக்கல/GNo
பிணம்/c
பிரதியில்/EU
பின்ன/Nj
புகுந்து/Bi
புத்தியில்/EU
புரட்சிக்கு/RSN
பூங்கா/DcN
பெட்டி/CTGNo
பெருபாலும்/N
பெருமூச்சு/DJTNA
பேரன்பு/HA
பேரு/GRNtrBDHCJITAn
பொருத்தமானது/RNt
பொறுப்பு/GRNtrSDHCJITiQA
போ/CNGuBVEQm
போடறது/GCNA
மடி/NE
மணிநேரத்துக்கு/Nm
மரணத்துக்கு/SN
மரத்த/j
மரத்து/BDHCA
மருந்த/NAv
மறைவில்/EU
மு/GRNtrBSDHCIAvmiQn
மாதவிலக்கு/N
மாறத்/u
மாறியது/CBJNn
மாறுது/n
மானிடம்/fm
மீட்பு/DH
மீது/GRSDTNiQn
மீறியது/RBA
முடி/CTGNjEDcQ
முடிய/NQ
முரண்பாட்டு/HA
முன்/T
மூளை/CTGNj
மேலு/GRNtrBSCiAn
மேற்பரப்பு/DHNA
மொழி/CTGNoSjE
மொழிகளில்/EU
மௌனம்/cT
வ்/uEU
வங்கிகளிடம்/EU
வண்டு/RrHA
வது/CGRDEQA
வதிவிட/fN
வந்த/ING
வயிற்றுக்கு/RSNm
வர்க்கத்து/DHCJA
வலி/CTEGBVNj
வளர்ப்பு/DHA
வன்னிக்கு/SNmi
வாங்கியிருக்க/No
வாய்ப்புகளுக்கு/R
வாரத்திற்கு/Nm
வாழ்க்கைய/Av
வாழிட/fN
விட்டுவிட்டு/BT
விடிவு/CA
விண்ணில்/EU
விலகி/EuBVN
விலகு/NE
விவசாயிகளிடம்/EU
விளங்குது/n
விளைந்தது/G
விளை/NEGDcQ
விஜய்/CN
வெண்ணில/Q
வெற்றிட/fN
வேண்டி/TEBVN
வைப்பது/CRrBDJNQ
ள/N
ளு/GRNtDHCAn
ஸ்டைலு/GRrSDCNQ
ஷ்/No
ஷோபாசக்தி/j
